fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX aZ Y 57
SFX aZ teler teler/n'q'd'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ teler telant/n'q'd'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ teler telé/L'D'Q' teler
SFX aZ teler telés/D'Q' teler
SFX aZ teler telée/L'D'Q' teler
SFX aZ teler telées/D'Q' teler
SFX aZ ételer ételle/j'n'q'l'm't's' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèle/j'n'q'l'm't's' èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételles/n'q'l'm't' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèles/n'q'l'm't' èteler
SFX aZ teler telons/n'q'l't' teler
SFX aZ teler telez/n'q'l'm' teler
SFX aZ ételer étellent/n'q'l'm't's' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlent/n'q'l'm't's' èteler
SFX aZ teler telais/j'n'q'l'm't' teler
SFX aZ teler telait/n'q'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ teler telions/n'q'l't' teler
SFX aZ teler teliez/n'q'l'm' teler
SFX aZ teler telaient/n'q'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ teler telai/j'n'q'l'm't' teler
SFX aZ teler telas/n'q'l'm't' teler
SFX aZ teler tela/n'q'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ teler telâmes/n'q'l't' teler
SFX aZ teler telâtes/n'q'l'm' teler
SFX aZ teler telèrent/n'q'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ ételer étellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerai/j'n'q'l'm't' èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleras/n'q'l'm't' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleras/n'q'l'm't' èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellera/n'q'l'm't's' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlera/n'q'l'm't's' èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerons/n'q'l't' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerons/n'q'l't' èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerez/n'q'l'm' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerez/n'q'l'm' èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleront/n'q'l'm't's' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleront/n'q'l'm't's' èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerais/j'n'q'l'm't' èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerait/n'q'l'm't's' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerait/n'q'l'm't's' èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerions/n'q'l't' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerions/n'q'l't' èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleriez/n'q'l'm' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleriez/n'q'l'm' èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleraient/n'q'l'm't's' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleraient/n'q'l'm't's' èteler
SFX aZ teler telasse/j'n'q'l'm't' teler
SFX aZ teler telasses/n'q'l'm't' teler
SFX aZ teler telât/n'q'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ teler telassions/n'q'l't' teler
SFX aZ teler telassiez/n'q'l'm' teler
SFX aZ teler telassent/n'q'l'm't's' teler
SFX aZ ételer ételle/n'l'm't' ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèle/n'l'm't' èteler
SFX aZ teler telons/n'l't' teler
SFX aZ teler telez/n'l'm' teler

SFX dA Y 42
SFX dA peler peler/n'q'd'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelant/n'q'd'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelé/L'D'Q' peler
SFX dA peler pelés/D'Q' peler
SFX dA peler pelée/L'D'Q' peler
SFX dA peler pelées/D'Q' peler
SFX dA peler pelle/j'n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelles/n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pelons/n'q'l't' peler
SFX dA peler pelez/n'q'l'm' peler
SFX dA peler pellent/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelais/j'n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pelait/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelions/n'q'l't' peler
SFX dA peler peliez/n'q'l'm' peler
SFX dA peler pelaient/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelai/j'n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pelas/n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pela/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelâmes/n'q'l't' peler
SFX dA peler pelâtes/n'q'l'm' peler
SFX dA peler pelèrent/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pelleras/n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pellera/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pellerons/n'q'l't' peler
SFX dA peler pellerez/n'q'l'm' peler
SFX dA peler pelleront/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pellerait/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pellerions/n'q'l't' peler
SFX dA peler pelleriez/n'q'l'm' peler
SFX dA peler pelleraient/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelasse/j'n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pelasses/n'q'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pelât/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelassions/n'q'l't' peler
SFX dA peler pelassiez/n'q'l'm' peler
SFX dA peler pelassent/n'q'l'm't's' peler
SFX dA peler pelle/n'l'm't' peler
SFX dA peler pelons/n'l't' peler
SFX dA peler pelez/n'l'm' peler

SFX f0 Y 33
SFX f0 ir ir/n'q'd'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir issant/n'q'd'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir is/j'n'q'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir it/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir issons/n'q'l't' ir
SFX f0 ir issez/n'q'l'm' ir
SFX f0 ir issent/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir issais/j'n'q'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir issait/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir issions/n'q'l't' ir
SFX f0 ir issiez/n'q'l'm' ir
SFX f0 ir issaient/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir îmes/n'q'l't' ir
SFX f0 ir îtes/n'q'l'm' ir
SFX f0 ir irent/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir irai/j'n'q'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir iras/n'q'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir ira/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir irons/n'q'l't' ir
SFX f0 ir irez/n'q'l'm' ir
SFX f0 ir iront/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir irais/j'n'q'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir irait/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir irions/n'q'l't' ir
SFX f0 ir iriez/n'q'l'm' ir
SFX f0 ir iraient/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir isse/j'n'q'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir isses/n'q'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir isse/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir ît/n'q'l'm't's' ir
SFX f0 ir is/n'l'm't' ir
SFX f0 ir issons/n'l't' ir
SFX f0 ir issez/n'l'm' ir

SFX fA Y 38
SFX fA aïr aïr/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aï/L'D'Q' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïs/D'Q' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïe/L'D'Q' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïes/D'Q' aïr
SFX fA aïr ais/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr ait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssons/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssais/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssions/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssiez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssaient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïs/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aït/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïmes/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïtes/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrai/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïras/n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïra/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrons/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïront/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrais/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïrions/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïriez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïraient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïsse/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïsses/n'q'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïsse/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fA aïr ais/n'l'm't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssons/n'l't' aïr
SFX fA aïr aïssez/n'l'm' aïr

SFX fB Y 29
SFX fB haïr haïr/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haï/q' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïs/q' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïe/q' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïes/q' aïr
SFX fB haïr hait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssons/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssions/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssiez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssaient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haït/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïmes/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïtes/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïra/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrons/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïront/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïrions/n'q'l't' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïriez/n'q'l'm' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïraient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïsse/n'q'l'm't's' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssons/n'l't' aïr
SFX fB haïr haïssez/n'l'm' aïr

SFX fC Y 11
SFX fC partir partir/n'q'd'l'm't's' impartir
SFX fC partir partissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' impartir
SFX fC partir parti/L'D'Q' impartir
SFX fC partir partis/D'Q' impartir
SFX fC partir partie/L'D'Q' impartir
SFX fC partir parties/D'Q' impartir
SFX fC partir partis/j'n'q'l'm't' impartir
SFX fC partir partit/n'q'l'm't's' impartir
SFX fC partir partissons/n'q'l't' impartir
SFX fC partir partissez/n'q'l'm' impartir
SFX fC partir partissent/n'q'l'm't's' impartir
