fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
abâtardir/f0p+
abêtir/f0p+
abolir/f0p+
abonnir/f0p+
aboutir/f0p+
abréagir/f0p+
abroutir/f0p+
abrutir/f0p+
accomplir/f0p+
accourcir/f0p+
accroupir/f0p+
adoucir/f0p+
affadir/f0p+
affaiblir/f0p+
affermir/f0p+
affranchir/f0p+
agir/f0p.
agonir/f0p+
agrandir/f0p+
aguerrir/f0p+
ahurir/f0p+
aigrir/f0p+
alanguir/f0p+
alentir/f0p+
allégir/f0p+
allotir/f0p+
alourdir/f0p+
alunir/f0p+
amaigrir/f0p+
amatir/f0p+
amerrir/f0p+
ameublir/f0p+
amincir/f0p+
amoindrir/f0p+
amollir/f0p+
amortir/f0p+
anéantir/f0p+
anoblir/f0p+
anordir/f0p.
aplanir/f0p+
aplatir/f0p+
appauvrir/f0p+
appesantir/f0p+
applaudir/f0p+
appointir/f0p+
approfondir/f0p+
arrondir/f0p+
assagir/f0p+
assainir/f0p+
asservir/f0p+
assombrir/f0p+
assortir/f0p+
assoupir/f0p+
assouplir/f0p+
assourdir/f0p+
assouvir/f0p+
assujettir/f0p+
attendrir/f0p+
atterrir/f0p+
attiédir/f0p+
avachir/f0p+
avertir/f0p+
aveulir/f0p+
avilir/f0p+
bannir/f0p+
barrir/f0p.
bâtir/f0p+
bénir/f0p+
blanchir/f0p+
blêmir/f0p+
blettir/f0p.
bleuir/f0p+
blondir/f0p+
blottir/f0p+
bondir/f0p.
bouffir/f0p+
brandir/f0p+
bruir/f0p+
brunir/f0p+
calmir/f0p.
candir/f0p+
catir/f0p+
chancir/f0p+
chauvir/f0p.
chérir/f0p+
choisir/f0p+
clapir/f0p+
compatir/f0p.
cônir/f0p+
convertir/f0p+
cotir/f0p+
crépir/f0p+
crèteler/aZ
crételer/aZ
croupir/f0p.
débâtir/f0p+
débleuir/f0p+
décatir/f0p+
décrépir/f0p+
décrudir/f0p+
définir/f0p+
défléchir/f0p+
défleurir/f0p+
défraichir/f0p+
défraîchir/f0p+
dégarnir/f0p+
dégauchir/f0p+
déglutir/f0p+
dégourdir/f0p+
dégrossir/f0p+
déguerpir/f0p+
déjaunir/f0p+
démaigrir/f0p+
démolir/f0p+
démunir/f0p+
dénantir/f0p+
dépérir/f0p.
dépolir/f0p+
déraidir/f0p+
dérougir/f0p+
désassortir/f0p+
désemplir/f0p+
désengourdir/f0p+
désenlaidir/f0p+
désépaissir/f0p+
désétablir/f0p+
désinvestir/f0p+
désobéir/f0p.
dessaisir/f0p+
dessertir/f0p+
désunir/f0p+
déverdir/f0p+
dévernir/f0p+
divertir/f0p+
doucir/f0p+
durcir/f0p+
ébahir/f0p+
ébaubir/f0p+
ébaudir/f0p+
éblouir/f0p+
ébroudir/f0p+
écatir/f0p+
échampir/f0p+
éclaircir/f0p+
écrouir/f0p+
effleurir/f0p.
élargir/f0p+
élégir/f0p+
embellir/f0p+
emboutir/f0p+
embrunir/f0p+
emplir/f0p+
empuantir/f0p+
enchérir/f0p+
endolorir/f0p+
endurcir/f0p+
enforcir/f0p+
enfouir/f0p+
engloutir/f0p+
engourdir/f0p+
enhardir/f0p+
enlaidir/f0p+
ennoblir/f0p+
enorgueillir/f0p+
enrichir/f0p+
ensevelir/f0p+
entrehaïr/fB
entre-haïr/fB
envahir/f0p+
envieillir/f0p+
épaissir/f0p+
épanouir/f0p+
époutir/f0p+
équarrir/f0p+
esbaudir/f0p+
estourbir/f0p+
établir/f0p+
étourdir/f0p+
étrécir/f0p+
évanouir/f0p+
faiblir/f0p.
farcir/f0p+
finir/f0p+
fléchir/f0p+
flétrir/f0p+
fleurir/f0p+
forcir/f0p.
fouir/f0p+
fourbir/f0p+
fournir/f0p+
fraichir/f0p.
fraîchir/f0p.
franchir/f0p+
frémir/f0p.
froidir/f0p.
fuir/f0p+
garantir/f0p+
garnir/f0p+
gauchir/f0p+
gaudir/f0p+
gémir/f0p+
glapir/f0p+
glatir/f0p.
grandir/f0p+
gravir/f0p+
grossir/f0p+
guérir/f0p+
haïr/fA
havir/f0p+
hennir/f0p.
honnir/f0p+
hourdir/f0p+
impartir/fC
infléchir/f0p+
interagir/f0p+
interpeler/dA
intervertir/f0p+
invertir/f0p+
investir/f0p+
jaillir/f0p+
jaunir/f0p+
jouir/f0p.
languir/f0p+
lotir/f0p+
louchir/f0p.
maigrir/f0p+
matir/f0p+
mégir/f0p+
meurtrir/f0p+
mincir/f0p.
moisir/f0p+
moitir/f0p+
mollir/f0p+
mugir/f0p+
munir/f0p+
murir/f0p+
mûrir/f0p+
nantir/f0p+
noircir/f0p+
nordir/f0p.
nourrir/f0p+
obéir/f0p+
obscurcir/f0p+
ourdir/f0p+
pâlir/f0p+
pâtir/f0p.
périr/f0p.
pervertir/f0p+
pétrir/f0p+
polir/f0p+
pourrir/f0p+
préaffranchir/f0p+
prédéfinir/f0p+
préétablir/f0p+
prémunir/f0p+
préremplir/f0p+
punir/f0p+
rabonnir/f0p+
rabougrir/f0p+
raccourcir/f0p+
racornir/f0p+
radoucir/f0p+
raffermir/f0p+
rafraichir/f0p+
rafraîchir/f0p+
ragaillardir/f0p+
ragrandir/f0p+
raidir/f0p+
rajeunir/f0p+
ralentir/f0p+
ramollir/f0p+
rancir/f0p+
raplatir/f0p+
rapointir/f0p+
rappointir/f0p+
rassir/f0p+
ravilir/f0p+
ravir/f0p+
réagir/f0p.
réassortir/f0p+
réatterrir/f0p+
rebâtir/f0p+
reblanchir/f0p+
rebondir/f0p+
rechampir/f0p+
réchampir/f0p+
reconvertir/f0p+
recrépir/f0p+
redéfinir/f0p+
redémolir/f0p+
réfléchir/f0p+
refranchir/f0p+
regarnir/f0p+
régir/f0p+
regrossir/f0p.
rejaillir/f0p.
rélargir/f0p+
remplir/f0p+
renformir/f0p+
repartir/f0p+
repétrir/f0p+
resalir/f0p+
ressaisir/f0p+
ressurgir/f0p.
rétablir/f0p+
rétrécir/f0p+
réunir/f0p+
reverdir/f0p+
revomir/f0p+
rondir/f0p+
rôtir/f0p+
rouir/f0p+
roustir/f0p+
saisir/f0p+
saurir/f0p+
sertir/f0p+
sous-investir/f0p+
subvertir/f0p+
surenchérir/f0p.
surgir/f0p.
surir/f0p.
tapir/f0p+
tartir/f0p.
terrir/f0p.
trahir/f0p+
travestir/f0p+
vagir/f0p.
vernir/f0p+
vioquir/f0p.
vrombir/f0p.
